Hawaii statutes.
§206M-5 Development rules. Whenever
the proceeds of special purpose revenue bonds are used to finance the cost of
an industrial park, the board shall adopt rules under chapter 91 to be followed
during the course of the development of any industrial park, which are to be
known as development rules in connection with health, safety, building,
planning, zoning, and land use. The rules, upon final adoption of a
development plan for an industrial park, shall supersede all other inconsistent
ordinances and rules relating to the use, zoning, planning, and development of
land and construction thereon within the industrial park. Rules adopted under
this section shall follow existing law, rules, ordinances, and regulations as
closely as is consistent with standards meeting minimum requirements of good
design, pleasant amenities, health, safety, and coordinated development. The
corporation shall establish policies and procedures for monitoring and ensuring
that the operation of the industrial park complies with these development rules
and may establish fines and penalties or take any other means available under
the law to eliminate any noncomplying action. [L 1983, c 152, pt of §2; am L
1985, c 112, §1; am L 2000, c 72, §9]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next